Vermont statutes. Title 31 Recreation and Sports
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 651.
Powers and duties of Board of Liquor and Lottery.

The Board of Liquor and Lottery shall adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, governing the establishment and operation of the State Lottery. The rules may include the following:

Types of lotteries to be conducted, provided that no lottery shall be conducted that depends upon the outcome of an athletic contest except that the lottery may be affiliated with a sporting event, or sweepstakes, where the outcome is determined solely by lot or random drawing and not by choice of the lottery participant.

Price of lottery tickets.

Number and size of prizes.

Manner of payment of prizes.

Manner and frequency of drawings.

The licensing of agents, provided that:

no person who has not attained the age of majority shall be licensed as an agent; and

no agent shall be in the business of solely selling lottery tickets.

Lottery product sales locations, which may include State agency liquor stores; private business establishments, except establishments holding first- or first- and third-class licenses pursuant to Title 7; fraternal, religious, and volunteer organizations; town clerks’ offices; and State fairs, race tracks, and other sporting arenas.

Method for sale of tickets, provided that they may be sold only for cash.

Manner of compensation of sales agents, claims agents, and financial institutions involved in the operation of the Lottery.

Manner of selecting winning tickets.

Apportionment of total revenues, within limits hereinafter specified, accruing to the State Lottery Fund among:

the payment of prizes to winning ticket holders;

the payment of all costs incurred in the creation, operation, and administration of the State Lottery, including compensation of the Board, Commissioner of Liquor and Lottery, employees of the Department of Liquor and Lottery, consultants, and contractors and other necessary expenses;

the repayment of monies advanced to the State Lottery Fund for initial funding of the State Lottery;

the transfer of monies to the Education Fund established by

16 V.S.A. § 4025

, to be used solely for the purposes of State and local funding of public education.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 82

, § 2, eff. April 27, 1977; amended

1997, No. 60

, § 86, eff. July 1, 1998;

2015, No. 23

, § 135;

2015, No. 57

, § 97, eff. July 2, 2016;

2015, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § E.141;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 90.

§ 652.
Multijurisdictional lottery games.

In addition to the Tri-State Lotto Compact provided for in subchapter 2 of this chapter, and the other authority to operate lotteries contained in this chapter, the Board of Liquor and Lottery is authorized to negotiate and contract with not more than four multijurisdictional lotteries to offer and provide multijurisdictional lottery games. The Board may join any multijurisdictional lottery that provides indemnification for its standing committee members, officers, directors, employees, and agents.
(a) (1) In addition to the Tri-State Lotto Compact provided for in subchapter 2 of this chapter, and the other authority to operate lotteries contained in this chapter, the Board of Liquor and Lottery is authorized to negotiate and contract with not more than four multijurisdictional lotteries to offer and provide multijurisdictional lottery games. The Board may join any multijurisdictional lottery that provides indemnification for its standing committee members, officers, directors, employees, and agents.

The Board shall adopt procedures pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 835

to govern the establishment and operation of any multijurisdictional lottery game authorized by this section. For each procedure proposed to be adopted or amended pursuant to this section, the Board shall publish the proposal on the Department of Liquor and Lottery’s website, provide notice of the proposal to all persons licensed to sell lottery tickets, provide not less than 30 days for public comment on the proposal, and hold not less than two public hearings at which members of the public may seek additional information or submit oral or written comments on the proposal.
(2) (A) The Board shall adopt procedures pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 835

to govern the establishment and operation of any multijurisdictional lottery game authorized by this section. For each procedure proposed to be adopted or amended pursuant to this section, the Board shall publish the proposal on the Department of Liquor and Lottery’s website, provide notice of the proposal to all persons licensed to sell lottery tickets, provide not less than 30 days for public comment on the proposal, and hold not less than two public hearings at which members of the public may seek additional information or submit oral or written comments on the proposal.

The Board of Liquor and Lottery shall not be required to initiate rulemaking pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 831(c)

in relation to a procedure adopted pursuant to this section.

A procedure adopted pursuant to this section shall have the force of law and be binding on all persons who play or sell the multijurisdictional lottery game.

In each fiscal year, the revenues received from the operation of any multijurisdictional lottery game authorized by this section, after payment of prizes and costs of administration, shall be deposited in the Education Fund established in

16 V.S.A. § 4025

.

The provisions of subdivisions 674L.1.1A through 674L.1.1I of this title shall apply to the payment of prizes to a person other than a winner for prizes awarded under any multijurisdictional lottery authorized by this section, except that the Board of Liquor and Lottery shall be responsible for implementing the provisions under this section, rather than the Tri-State Lotto Commission.

HISTORY:

Added 2003, No 19, § 49, eff. May 6, 2003; amended

2007, No. 65

, § 296, eff. June 4, 2007;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 91.

§ 653.
License fees.

A license fee shall be charged for each sales license granted to a person for the purpose of selling lottery tickets at the time the person is first granted a license. The fee shall be fixed by the Board of Liquor and Lottery, but no license fee in excess of $50.00 may be charged.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 82

, § 2, eff. April 27, 1977; amended

2013, No. 191

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 93.

§ 654.
Interstate lottery; consultant; management.

The Board of Liquor and Lottery may develop and operate a lottery or the State may enter into a contractual agreement with another state or states to provide for the operation of the Lottery. Approval of the Joint Fiscal Committee and the Governor shall be required for such contractual agreements with other states.

If no interstate contract is entered into, the Board shall obtain the service of an experienced lottery design and implementation consultant. The fee for the consultant may be fixed or may be based upon a percentage of gross receipts realized from the Lottery.

The Board may enter into a facilities management type of agreement for operation of the Lottery by a third party.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 82

, § 2, eff. April 27, 1977; amended

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 94.

§ 655.
Duties of the Commissioner.

The State Lottery shall be under the immediate supervision and direction of the Commissioner of Liquor and Lottery.

The Commissioner shall:

Supervise and administer the operation of the Lottery within the rules adopted by the Board of Liquor and Lottery.

Subject to the approval of the Board, enter into contracts necessary for the proper creation, administration, operation, modification, and promotion of the State Lottery or any part of the Lottery. These contracts shall not be assignable.

License sales agents and suspend or revoke any license in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules of the Board.

Act as Secretary to the Board, but as a nonvoting member of the Board.

Employ professional and secretarial staff as necessary to carry out the functions of the Division of the Lottery. 3 V.S.A. chapter 13 shall apply to employees of the Division.

Annually prepare a budget and submit it to the Board.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 82

, § 2, eff. April 27, 1977; amended

1987, No. 121

, §§ 20, 21;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 95.

§ 656.
State Lottery Fund.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury a separate fund to be known as the State Lottery Fund. The Fund shall consist of all revenues received from the Treasurer for initial funding, from sale of lottery tickets, from license fees, and from all other money credited or transferred from any other fund or source pursuant to law. The monies in the State Lottery Fund shall be disbursed pursuant to subdivision 651(11) of this title, and shall be disbursed by the Treasurer on warrants issued by the Commissioner of Finance and Management, when authorized by the Commissioner of Liquor and Lottery and approved by the Commissioner of Finance and Management.

Expenditures for administrative and overhead expenses of the operation of the State Lottery, except agent and bank commissions, shall be paid from Lottery receipts from an appropriation authorized for that purpose. Agent commissions shall be set by the Board of Liquor and Lottery and shall not exceed 6.25 percent of gross receipts and bank commissions shall not exceed one percent of gross receipts. Once the draw game results become official, the payment of any commission on any draw game ticket that wins at least $10,000.00 shall be made through the normal course of processing payments to lottery agents, regardless of whether the winning ticket is claimed.

Not less than 50 percent of gross receipts shall be paid out as prizes.

Annuities for lottery winners shall be purchased by the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall make all investments of State Lottery Fund monies.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 82

, § 2, eff. April 27, 1977; amended

1979, No. 54

, § 3;

1979, No. 98

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1983, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 5(b);

1985, No. 15

;

1997, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 66g;

2003, No. 66

, § 52a;

2013, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 96.

§ 657.
Report of the Board.

The Board of Liquor and Lottery shall make an annual report to the Governor and to the General Assembly on or before the 10th day of January in each year. The report shall include an account of the Board’s actions and the receipts derived under the provisions of this chapter, the practical effects of the application of the proceeds of the Lottery, and any recommendation for legislation that the Board deems advisable.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 82

, § 2, eff. April 27, 1977; amended

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 97.

§ 658.
Postaudits.

All State Lottery accounts and transactions of the Board of Liquor and Lottery shall be subject to annual postaudits conducted by independent auditors retained by the Board for this purpose. The Board may order other audits as it deems necessary and desirable.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 82

, § 2, eff. April 27, 1977; amended

2015, No. 58

, § E.141.1;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 98.

§ 659.
Sales and purchase of lottery tickets.

The following acts relating to the purchase and sale of lottery tickets are prohibited:

Persons convicted of a felony within five years of the date of making application shall not be licensed to sell lottery tickets.

No tickets shall be sold at a price higher than the price printed on the lottery tickets.

No tickets shall be sold to individuals who have not attained the age of majority. However, tickets may be given as gifts to minors or any other individuals except as prohibited by this chapter.

No member of the Board of Liquor and Lottery or employee of the Department of Liquor and Lottery, or member of his or her immediate household, shall claim or receive prize money under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 82

, § 2, eff. April 27, 1977; amended

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 182;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 99.

§ 660.
Unclaimed prize money.

Lottery prize winners will be allowed one year from their prize eligibility date to claim a prize.
All prize money that is unclaimed after one year shall revert to the State Lottery Fund.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 82

, § 2, eff. April 27, 1977; amended

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 100.

§ 661.
State gaming laws inapplicable as to lottery.

13 V.S.A. chapter 51, subchapters 1, 2, and 3 shall not apply to the sale of lottery tickets as provided in this chapter. No law providing for any penalty or disability for the sale of lottery tickets or any acts done in connection with a lottery shall apply to the sale of tickets or acts performed pursuant to this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 82

, § 2, eff. April 27, 1977; amended

2003, No. 19

, § 51, eff. May 6, 2003;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 101.

§ 662.
Penalties.

Any person who is convicted of violating a provision of this chapter shall be fined not more than $500.00 or imprisoned for not more than two years, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 82

, § 2, eff. April 27, 1977; amended

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 102.

§ 663.
Publication of odds.

Any promotional advertising shall, to the extent practicable, estimate the general odds of winning.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 82

, § 2, eff. April 27, 1977; amended

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 103.

§ 664.
Fiscal Committee review.

Whenever the gross receipts of the State Lottery fall below $450,000.00 during any three-month period after the commencement of the first game, the Joint Fiscal Committee shall immediately investigate the condition of the State Lottery, and its likelihood for continuing success. If, after investigation, the Joint Fiscal Committee determines that continuation of the Lottery is not in the best interests of the State, it may order the termination of the State Lottery.

This section shall not apply in the event the Board of Liquor and Lottery enters into a facilities management agreement pursuant to the provisions of subsection 654(c) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 82

, § 2, eff. April 27, 1977; amended

2018, No. 1

, (Sp. Sess.), § 104.